Utah statutes.
31A-26-202.   Application for license.

(1) (a)  The application for a license as an independent adjuster or public adjuster shall be:

(i)  made to the commissioner on forms and in a manner the commissioner prescribes; and

(ii)  accompanied by the applicable fee, which is not refunded if the application is denied.

(b)  The application shall provide:

(i)  information about the applicant's identity, including:

(A)  the applicant's:

(I)  Social Security number; or

(II)  federal employer identification number;

(B)  the applicant's personal history, experience, education, and business record;

(C)  if the applicant is a natural person, whether the applicant is 18 years of age or older; and

(D)  whether the applicant has committed an act that is a ground for denial, suspension, or revocation as set forth in Section 31A-25-208; and

(ii)  any other information as the commissioner reasonably requires.

(2)  The commissioner may require documents reasonably necessary to verify the information contained in the application.

(3)  An applicant's Social Security number contained in an application filed under this section is a private record under Section 63G-2-302.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

